dev/adv.dix
    <pardef n="cineál/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="abhus/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lastuaidh/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="amugha/__adv">
      <e r="LR" a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="diabhalta/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ach/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="soir/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="aduaidh/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="thíos/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="thall/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="measartha/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lastuas/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="amá/rach__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l>rach</l><r>rach<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" a="irishfst"><p><l>ireach</l><r>rach<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cheana féin/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="amach/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lastoir/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="déanach/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ar ais/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="taobh amuigh/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="milteannach/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cheana/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="anonn/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="nuig/e__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r>e<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r>e<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="deas/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="amairinis/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ann/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tuaidh/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="chóir/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="abhaile/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fiánta/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="aréir/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="arú/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="anuas/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lasmuigh/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fós/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="breá/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="istigh/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="amuigh/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ó thuaidh/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="a thuilleadh/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ámh/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="chuig/e__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" a="irishfst"><p><l>is</l><r>e<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" a="irishfst"><p><l>int</l><r>e<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cathain/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="anoir/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="lastuas" a="irishfst"><i>lastuas</i><par n="lastuas/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="chóir" a="irishfst"><i>chóir</i><par n="chóir/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tuaidh" a="irishfst"><i>tuaidh</i><par n="tuaidh/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="abhaile" a="irishfst"><i>abhaile</i><par n="abhaile/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="anonn" a="irishfst"><i>anonn</i><par n="anonn/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="aréir" a="irishfst"><i>aréir</i><par n="aréir/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="measartha" a="irishfst"><i>measartha</i><par n="measartha/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="a thuilleadh" a="irishfst"><i>a thuilleadh</i><par n="a thuilleadh/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="arú" a="irishfst"><i>arú</i><par n="arú/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="cheana féin" a="irishfst"><i>cheana féin</i><par n="cheana féin/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="chuige" a="irishfst"><i>chuig</i><par n="chuig/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="amuigh" a="irishfst"><i>amuigh</i><par n="amuigh/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ámh" a="irishfst"><i>ámh</i><par n="ámh/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="cheana" a="irishfst"><i>cheana</i><par n="cheana/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="abhus" a="irishfst"><i>abhus</i><par n="abhus/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="milteannach" a="irishfst"><i>milteannach</i><par n="milteannach/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="breá" a="irishfst"><i>breá</i><par n="breá/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="cineál" a="irishfst"><i>cineál</i><par n="cineál/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="soir" a="irishfst"><i>soir</i><par n="soir/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="taobh amuigh" a="irishfst"><i>taobh amuigh</i><par n="taobh amuigh/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="fós" a="irishfst"><i>fós</i><par n="fós/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="thall" a="irishfst"><i>thall</i><par n="thall/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ann" a="irishfst"><i>ann</i><par n="ann/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="istigh" a="irishfst"><i>istigh</i><par n="istigh/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="lastoir" a="irishfst"><i>lastoir</i><par n="lastoir/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="amach" a="irishfst"><i>amach</i><par n="amach/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="aduaidh" a="irishfst"><i>aduaidh</i><par n="aduaidh/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="lastuaidh" a="irishfst"><i>lastuaidh</i><par n="lastuaidh/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="fiánta" a="irishfst"><i>fiánta</i><par n="fiánta/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ach" a="irishfst"><i>ach</i><par n="ach/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="thíos" a="irishfst"><i>thíos</i><par n="thíos/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nuige" a="irishfst"><i>nuig</i><par n="nuig/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ó thuaidh" a="irishfst"><i>ó thuaidh</i><par n="ó thuaidh/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="diabhalta" a="irishfst"><i>diabhalta</i><par n="diabhalta/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="amugha" a="irishfst"><i>amugha</i><par n="amugha/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="lasmuigh" a="irishfst"><i>lasmuigh</i><par n="lasmuigh/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ar ais" a="irishfst"><i>ar ais</i><par n="ar ais/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="déanach" a="irishfst"><i>déanach</i><par n="déanach/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="cathain" a="irishfst"><i>cathain</i><par n="cathain/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="deas" a="irishfst"><i>deas</i><par n="deas/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="amairinis" a="irishfst"><i>amairinis</i><par n="amairinis/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="anoir" a="irishfst"><i>anoir</i><par n="anoir/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="amárach" a="irishfst"><i>amá</i><par n="amá/rach__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="anuas" a="irishfst"><i>anuas</i><par n="anuas/__adv"/></e>
